District of Columbia statutes.
22-3252

Blackmail.

(a)

A person commits the offense of blackmail, if, with intent to obtain property of another or to cause another to do or refrain from doing any act, that person threatens:

(1)

To accuse any person of a crime;

(2)

To expose a secret or publicize an asserted fact, whether true or false, tending to subject any person to hatred, contempt, or ridicule; or

(3)

To impair the reputation of any person, including a deceased person.

(b)

Any person convicted of blackmail shall be fined not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01 or imprisoned for not more than 5 years, or both.

History

Dec. 1, 1982, D.C. Law 4-164, § 152, 29 DCR 3976
June 11, 2013, D.C. Law 19-317, § 205(u), 60 DCR 2064

Section References

This section is referenced in § 23-546.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 22-3852.

Effect of Amendments

The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-317 substituted “not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01” for “not more than $1,000” in (b).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 205(u) of the Criminal Fine Proportionality Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-45, April 1, 2013, 60 DCR 5400, 20 DCSTAT 1300).

Editor's Notes

Applicability of D.C. Law 19-317: Section 401 of D.C. Law 19-317 provided that the act shall apply only to offenses committed on or after June 11, 2013.